Vermont statutes. Title 13 Crimes and Criminal Procedure
Subchapter 1. Bills of Lading

§ 2051.
Issue of bill of lading for goods not received.

An officer, agent, or servant or a carrier, who, with intent to defraud, issues or aids in issuing a bill of lading, knowing that all or any part of the goods for which the bill of lading is issued, has not been received by such carrier or by an agent of such carrier or by a connecting carrier or is not under the carrier’s control at the time of issuing the bill of lading, shall be imprisoned not more than five years or fined not more than $5,000.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Added 1966, No. 29 (Sp. Sess.), § 6.

§ 2052.
Issue of bill of lading containing false statement.

An officer, agent, or servant of a carrier, who, with intent to defraud, issues or aids in issuing a bill of lading for goods knowing that it contains any false statement, shall be imprisoned not more than one year or fined not more than $1,000.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Added 1966, No. 29 (Sp. Sess.), § 7.

§ 2053.
Issue of duplicate bills of lading not so marked.

An officer, agent, or servant of a carrier, who, with intent to defraud, issues or aids in issuing a duplicate or additional negotiable bill of lading for goods in violation of 9A V.S.A. § 7—402, knowing that a former negotiable bill of lading for the same goods or any part of them is outstanding and uncancelled, shall be imprisoned not more than five years or fined not more than $5,000.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Added 1966, No. 29 (Sp. Sess.), § 8.

§ 2054.
Negotiation of bill of lading for goods subject to security interest.

A person who ships goods to which he or she has not title or in which there is a security interest and who takes for such goods a negotiable bill of lading which he or she afterwards negotiates for value with intent to deceive and without disclosing his or her want of title or the existence of the security interest, shall be imprisoned not more than one year or fined not more than $1,000.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Added 1966, No. 29 (Sp. Sess.), § 9.

§ 2055.
Negotiation of bill of lading when goods are not in carrier’s possession.

A person who, with intent to deceive, negotiates or transfers for value a bill of lading knowing that any or all of the goods that by the terms of the bill of lading appear to have been received for transportation by the carrier that issued the bill of lading, are not in the possession or control of the carrier or of a connecting carrier, without disclosing this fact, shall be imprisoned not more than five years or fined not more than $5,000.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Added 1966, No. 29 (Sp. Sess.), § 10.

§ 2056.
Inducing carrier to issue bill of lading when goods have not been received.

A person who, with intent to defraud, secures the issue by a carrier of a bill of lading, knowing that at the time of issue, any or all of the goods described in the bill of lading as received for transportation have not been received by the carrier or an agent of the carrier or a connecting carrier or are not under the carrier’s control, by inducing an officer, agent, or servant of the carrier falsely to believe that the goods have been received by the carrier or are under its control, shall be imprisoned not more than five years or fined not more than $5,000.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Added 1966, No. 29 (Sp. Sess.), § 11.

§ 2057.
Issue of nonnegotiable bill of lading not so marked.

A person who, with intent to defraud, issues or aids in issuing a nonnegotiable bill of lading without the words “not negotiable” placed plainly upon the face thereof, shall be imprisoned not more than five years or fined not more than $5,000.00, or both.

HISTORY:

Added 1966, No. 29 (Sp. Sess.), § 12.